Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1001.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 109v. (1) This state shall not implement policy that is contradictory or interferes with the implementation of federal definitions or requirements for a certified community behavioral health clinic. (2) This state shall develop a process of determination for additional certified community behavioral health clinic sites within specific geographic regions that must comply with federal community behavioral health clinic requirements, to address service area overlap. (3) This state must continue to participate with the federal government to implement certified community behavioral health clinics. To opt out of participation, there must be a vote of the legislature. If the legislature votes to opt out of participation, the department has 12 months after the date of the vote to discontinue the operation of certified community behavioral health clinics under this section. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 1000 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.